Colorado, session 2026A, SB080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 25 to title
26 as follows:
ARTICLE 25
Cradle to Career Grant Program
26-25-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 25 IS THE "CRADLE TO CAREER
GRANT PROGRAM ACT".
26-25-102. Definitions.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 25, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "CHILD" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 19-1-103.
(2) "COUNCIL" MEANS THE CRADLE TO CAREER ADVISORY COUNCIL
CREATED IN SECTION 26-25-104.
(3) "DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA" MEANS A GEOGRAPHICALLY
BOUNDED LOCAL SERVICE AREA IN WHICH THE CONCENTRATION OF POVERTY
MEETS THE LEVEL SPECIFIED IN SECTION 26-25-103 (5)(b)(I).
(4) "ELIGIBLE ENTITY" MEANS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER, A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AN
INDIAN TRIBE OR TRIBAL ORGANIZATION, OR A NONPROFIT OR
NOT-FOR-PROFIT COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATION.
(5) "FUND" MEANS THE CRADLE TO CAREER GRANT PROGRAM CASH
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 26-25-107.
(6) "GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE CRADLE TO CAREER GRANT
PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 26-25-103.
(7) "HIGH-QUALITY" MEANS EVIDENCE-BASED OR
EVIDENCE-INFORMED.
(8) "LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER" MEANS:
(a) A SCHOOL DISTRICT;
(b) A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT
PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF TITLE 22;
(c) A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE CHARTER
SCHOOL INSTITUTE PURSUANT TO PART 5 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF TITLE 22; OR
(d) A BOARD OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES CREATED AND OPERATING
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 5 OF TITLE 22.
(9) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A STATUTORY OR HOME RULE
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-080

CITY, TOWN, CITY AND COUNTY, OR COUNTY.
(10) "SUBCONTRACTED ENTITY" MEANS AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT
ENTERS A FORMAL PARTNERSHIP WITH AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY RECEIVING A
GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25 AND THAT PROVIDES
COMPLEMENTARY COMMUNITY RESOURCES IN THE GRANT RECIPIENT'S
DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA.
(11) "YOUTH" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS UNDER TWENTY-FIVE
YEARS OLD.
26-25-103. Cradle to career grant program - created - program
guidelines and criteria - rules.
(1) THE CRADLE TO CAREER GRANT PROGRAM IS CREATED IN THE
STATE DEPARTMENT. THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE
GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE ENTITIES TO PROMOTE COORDINATED
COMMUNITY-BASED SUPPORTS AND SERVICES THAT OPEN OPPORTUNITIES
FOR ECONOMIC MOBILITY FROM POVERTY. THE GRANT PROGRAM MUST
CONNECT CHILDREN AND YOUTH WITH HIGH-QUALITY EDUCATIONAL AND
EXTRACURRICULAR PROGRAMMING AND FAMILIES WITH KEY HEALTH AND
SOCIAL SERVICES IN ORDER TO IMPROVE PRENATAL AND EARLY CHILDHOOD
OUTCOMES, STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT, AND WORKFORCE READINESS; TO HELP
CHILDREN AND YOUTH MAKE SMOOTH TRANSITIONS THROUGHOUT THE
SECONDARY AND POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION SYSTEMS; AND TO CREATE
WEALTH BUILDING OPPORTUNITIES THAT PROMOTE LIFELONG FINANCIAL
SECURITY.
(2) GRANT RECIPIENTS MAY USE THE MONEY RECEIVED THROUGH
THE GRANT PROGRAM FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:
(a) PROMOTING FAMILY STABILITY AND WELL-BEING THROUGH
ACCESS TO:
(I) SAFE, AFFORDABLE, AND STABLE HOUSING;
(II) HIGH-QUALITY CHILD CARE AND EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAMS
THAT SUPPORT CHILD DEVELOPMENT AND SUCCESSFUL TRANSITIONS TO AND
THROUGH ELEMENTARY EDUCATION;
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-080

(III) ADEQUATE NUTRITION AND HEALTH CARE, INCLUDING
MATERNAL, BEHAVIORAL, AND MENTAL HEALTH CARE; AND
(IV) SUPPORTS AND SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH WITH
DISABILITIES;
(b) IMPLEMENTING FAMILY-STRENGTHENING PUBLIC SAFETY
PROTECTIONS, COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT STRATEGIES, AND INTERVENTIONS
THAT ENHANCE CHILD AND YOUTH WELFARE, PREVENT JUSTICE-SYSTEM
INVOLVEMENT, AND REDUCE EXPOSURE TO SUBSTANCE USE, FAMILY
CONFLICT, AND CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT;
(c) PROVIDING HIGH-QUALITY EDUCATIONAL AND ACADEMIC
ENRICHMENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR K-12 STUDENTS THAT SUPPLEMENT BUT
DO NOT SUPPLANT INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, INCLUDING OUT-OF-SCHOOL-TIME
PROGRAMS THAT:
(I) FOCUS ON SPORTS AND FITNESS, CHARACTER AND LEADERSHIP, OR
ARTS AND CULTURE; AND
(II) REINFORCE AND COMPLEMENT SCHOOL-BASED ACADEMIC
PROGRAMS IN A SAFE AND HEALTHY ENVIRONMENT;
(d) CONNECTING YOUTH TO QUALITY JOBS AND IN-DEMAND
OCCUPATIONS THROUGH POSTSECONDARY AND WORKFORCE READINESS
PROGRAMS THAT MAY INCLUDE WORK-BASED LEARNING, CREDENTIAL
COMPLETION, OR APPRENTICESHIPS, WITH A FOCUS ON HIGH-NEED,
IN-DEMAND CAREER PATHWAYS;
(e) USING ASSET-BUILDING STRATEGIES TO ADDRESS WEALTH
DISPARITIES AND INCREASE ACCESS TO HIGHER EDUCATION, HOME
OWNERSHIP, AND OPPORTUNITIES FOR ENTREPRENEURSHIP;
(f) COORDINATING AND ALIGNING PROGRAMS AND STRATEGIES
WITHIN A DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA, INCLUDING THE DEVELOPMENT OF
SHARED DATA SYSTEMS; AND
(g) MATCHING ADDITIONAL FEDERAL, LOCAL, OR PRIVATE FUNDING
FOR POVERTY REDUCTION INITIATIVES IN THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY'S DESIGNATED
SERVICE AREA.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-080

(3) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT
PROGRAM AND, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE APPROPRIATIONS, SHALL AWARD
GRANTS AS PROVIDED IN THIS ARTICLE 25. GRANTS MUST BE PAID OUT OF
THE CRADLE TO CAREER GRANT PROGRAM CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
26-25-107.
(4) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL IMPLEMENT THE GRANT
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 25. THE STATE DEPARTMENT
SHALL ADOPT THE RULES REQUIRED IN THIS ARTICLE 25 AND ANY
ADDITIONAL RULES NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(5) (a) THE STATE DEPARTMENT, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE
COUNCIL, SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE PROGRAM GUIDELINES,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO:
(I) GUIDELINES FOR THE CONTENT OF AN ECONOMIC MOBILITY NEEDS
ASSESSMENT AND COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL FOR SINGLE ELIGIBLE ENTITY
APPLICANTS AND MULTIPLE ELIGIBLE ENTITY APPLICANTS APPLYING JOINTLY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-25-105 (2);
(II) GUIDELINES FOR PROPOSING, APPROVING, AND IMPLEMENTING
DIFFERENT GRANT STRUCTURES TO PROMOTE BUILDING CAPACITY FOR
DELIVERING, IN AN APPLICANT'S DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA, SERVICES THAT
PROMOTE ECONOMIC MOBILITY. GRANT STRUCTURES MAY INCLUDE
PLANNING, EARLY IMPLEMENTATION, AND FULL IMPLEMENTATION PHASES
FOR SERVICE DELIVERY.
(III) PROCESSES FOR AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY TO SOLICIT AND
INCORPORATE INTO ITS COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL INPUT FROM
ORGANIZATIONS AND INDIVIDUALS IN THE COMMUNITY PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) IN ADDITION TO THE GUIDELINES DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE DEPARTMENT, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE COUNCIL, SHALL DEVELOP CRITERIA FOR
AWARDING GRANTS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE FOLLOWING
REQUIREMENTS:
(I) THAT THE COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL TARGETS A DESIGNATED
SERVICE AREA IN WHICH AT LEAST THIRTY PERCENT OF HOUSEHOLDS WITH
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-080

CHILDREN HAVE AN ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME AT OR BELOW TWO
HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE;
(II) THAT THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY'S COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL
PRIORITIZES CONNECTING CHILDREN AND YOUTH WITH HIGH-QUALITY
EDUCATIONAL, EXTRACURRICULAR, OR WORKFORCE PROGRAMMING OR
FAMILIES WITH KEY HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE AREAS OF GREATEST NEED IDENTIFIED IN THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY'S NEEDS
ASSESSMENT;
(III) THAT THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY HAS SOLICITED AND INCORPORATED
INTO ITS COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL INPUT FROM ORGANIZATIONS AND
INDIVIDUALS IN THE COMMUNITY, INCLUDING LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS,
COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH CENTERS, LOCAL NONPROFIT OR
NOT-FOR-PROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES,
BUSINESSES, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT LEADERS;
(IV) THAT THE COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL RELIES ON
EVIDENCE-BASED OR EVIDENCE-INFORMED PRACTICES IN THE DELIVERY OF
SERVICES, SUPPORTS, AND OPPORTUNITIES;
(V) THAT THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY DEMONSTRATES EVIDENCE OF
IMPACT WITH RESPECT TO THE TYPE OF PROGRAMMING OR SERVICES THAT
THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY PROPOSES TO PROVIDE WITH A GRANT AWARD; AND
(VI) THAT THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY HAS, WITH A SUCCESSFUL TRACK
RECORD, BEEN SERVING THE DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA FOR AT LEAST
THREE YEARS.
(c) AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT RECEIVES A GRANT AWARD PURSUANT
TO THIS ARTICLE 25 MUST:
(I) COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND LOCAL HEALTH AND
SAFETY REGULATIONS;
(II) REQUIRE ITS EMPLOYEES TO SUBMIT TO A NAME-BASED CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK;
(III) REQUIRE EVIDENCE OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY, INCLUDING
BONDING OR LICENSURE, FOR EMPLOYEES INVOLVED IN THE ELIGIBLE
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-080

ENTITY'S FINANCIAL AFFAIRS;
(IV) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE "COLORADO OPEN
RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24;
(V) DELIVER SERVICES OR ACCEPT PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS WITHOUT
REGARD TO RACE, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN, CREED, SEX, GENDER IDENTITY,
ETHNICITY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, MENTAL OR PHYSICAL DISABILITY,
ATHLETIC PERFORMANCE, PROFICIENCY IN THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE, OR PAST
ACADEMIC OR DISCIPLINARY HISTORY;
(VI) COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS
PROHIBITING DISCRIMINATION, INCLUDING TITLE IX OF THE FEDERAL
"EDUCATION AMENDMENTS OF 1972", THE FEDERAL "AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", SECTION 504 OF THE FEDERAL
"REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973", AND TITLES VI AND VII OF THE FEDERAL
"CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964"; AND
(VII) IF THE ELIGIBLE ENTITY IS A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER, NOT
USE MONEY AWARDED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25 TO SUPPORT ITS
STANDARD ACADEMIC PROGRAMMING OR OPERATIONS.
(d) IN ADDITION TO THE GUIDELINES AND CRITERIA DEVELOPED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (5)(a) AND (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH TIMELINES FOR SUBMITTING AND REVIEWING
GRANT APPLICATIONS AND TIMELINES FOR SUBMITTING THE LIST OF ELIGIBLE
ENTITIES CHOSEN TO RECEIVE GRANTS TO THE COUNCIL.
(6) THE STATE DEPARTMENT IS ONLY REQUIRED TO IMPLEMENT
SECTIONS 26-25-103 (3), 26-25-103 (4), 26-25-103 (5), 26-25-104,
26-25-105, AND 26-25-106 IF THE SECTIONS BECOME EFFECTIVE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 26-25-108. THE WORK OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT, THE
COUNCIL, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25
IS CONTINGENT ON MONEY BEING AVAILABLE TO IMPLEMENT THIS ARTICLE
25.
26-25-104. Cradle to career advisory council - created - duties
- repeal.
(1) THE CRADLE TO CAREER ADVISORY COUNCIL IS CREATED IN THE
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-080

STATE DEPARTMENT.
(2) (a) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT:
(A) ONE MEMBER WHO IS AN EDUCATOR WITH EXPERIENCE IN EARLY
CHILDHOOD CARE AND EDUCATION;
(B) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION OR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION WITH EXPERTISE IN
MEASURING CHILD AND YOUTH POVERTY AND IMPLEMENTING POLICIES TO
ALLEVIATE IT;
(C) ONE MEMBER WHO HAS EXPERTISE AND EXPERIENCE IN
POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION AND STATE WORKFORCE READINESS
INITIATIVES;
(D) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS LICENSED TEACHERS; AND
(E) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING SCHOOL EXECUTIVES.
(II) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT:
(A) ONE MEMBER WHO, AT THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT, HAS BEEN
SERVING IN A PROFESSIONAL CAPACITY AT A COLORADO PUBLIC SCHOOL OR
SCHOOL DISTRICT FOR AT LEAST THREE YEARS, AND WHO HAS HAD DIRECT
RESPONSIBILITY FOR AND ACTIVELY PARTICIPATED IN THE IMPLEMENTATION
OF A COMPREHENSIVE COMMUNITY SCHOOL STRATEGY;
(B) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS A STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION
REPRESENTING LOCAL SCHOOL BOARDS;
(C) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS PROVIDERS OF DIRECT SERVICES
TO LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS; AND
(D) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ORGANIZATION
THAT REPRESENTS RURAL LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS.
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-080

(III) THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SHALL APPOINT A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY WHO HAS
EXPERTISE IN ECONOMIC MOBILITY ISSUES AND A REPRESENTATIVE OF A
STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS PARENTS.
(IV) THE COMMISSIONER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OR
THE COMMISSIONER'S DESIGNEE.
(b) IN APPOINTING THE MEMBERS OF THE COUNCIL, THE APPOINTING
AUTHORITIES SHALL CONSIDER ETHNICITY, GENDER, AND GEOGRAPHIC
REPRESENTATION TO PROMOTE DIVERSE COUNCIL MEMBERSHIP. A MEMBER
OF THE COUNCIL MUST BE A COLORADO RESIDENT AND MUST NOT BE A
GRANTOR OR DONOR WHOSE GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS ARE CREDITED
TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-25-107.
(c) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THE INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS TO THE COUNCIL NO LATER THAN ONE MONTH AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
(d) EACH MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL WHO IS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE COUNCIL MEMBER'S
RESPECTIVE APPOINTING AUTHORITY. THE TERM OF APPOINTMENT IS FOUR
YEARS; EXCEPT THAT THE TERM OF EACH MEMBER INITIALLY APPOINTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS TWO YEARS.
(3) MEMBERS OF THE COUNCIL SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION.
(4) (a) NO LATER THAN TWO MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
THIS SECTION, BUT NOT BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
SHALL ORGANIZE AND CONVENE THE FIRST MEETING OF THE COUNCIL.
(b) THE COUNCIL SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG THE COUNCIL'S
MEMBERS TO SERVE FOR A TERM NOT TO EXCEED TWO YEARS, AS
DETERMINED BY THE COUNCIL. A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL IS NOT ELIGIBLE
TO SERVE AS CHAIR FOR MORE THAN TWO SUCCESSIVE TERMS.
(c) THE COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT LEAST TWO TIMES PER YEAR. THE
CHAIR MAY CALL ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS ARE NECESSARY FOR THE
COUNCIL TO COMPLETE ITS DUTIES.
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-080

(5) THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(a) APPROVE OR DISAPPROVE ELIGIBLE ENTITIES THAT THE STATE
DEPARTMENT HAS SELECTED AS POTENTIAL GRANT RECIPIENTS; AND
(b) COLLABORATE WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT TO DEVELOP AND
MAKE AVAILABLE GRANT PROGRAM GUIDELINES AND CRITERIA FOR
AWARDING GRANTS PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-25-103 (5)(a) AND (5)(b).
26-25-105. Cradle to career grant program - application -
awards.
(1) TO RECEIVE A GRANT, AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY MUST SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH RULES
ADOPTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. AT A MINIMUM, THE APPLICATION
MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(a) A COMMUNITY ECONOMIC MOBILITY NEEDS ASSESSMENT THAT:
(I) IDENTIFIES THE APPLICANT'S DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA;
(II) ANALYZES EXISTING CONDITIONS AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY
OPPORTUNITIES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH AND THEIR FAMILIES IN THE
DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA; AND
(III) INCLUDES QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DATA MEASURING
POVERTY, DEMOGRAPHIC DISPARITIES, AND NEEDS WITHIN THE DESIGNATED
SERVICE AREA IN CONNECTION WITH EACH OF THE PERMISSIBLE USES OF
GRANT MONEY IDENTIFIED IN SECTION 26-25-103 (2), AND SPECIFIES AT
LEAST ONE POLICY AREA AS THE FOCAL POINT FOR INTERVENTION;
(b) A PROPOSAL FOR THE FORMATION OF A FORMAL PARTNERSHIP
WITH OTHER ELIGIBLE ENTITIES WITH ESTABLISHED TIES TO THE COMMUNITY
THAT CAN PROVIDE COMPLEMENTARY COMMUNITY RESOURCES IN THE
APPLICANT'S DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA. IF AN APPLICANT IS A LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER, THE APPLICATION MUST BE COMPLETED IN
COLLABORATION WITH AT LEAST ONE OTHER ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT THE
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER DESIGNATES AS A FORMAL PARTNER PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b). THE PROPOSAL FOR THE FORMATION OF A
FORMAL PARTNERSHIP MUST IDENTIFY ALL PROSPECTIVE SUBCONTRACTED
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-080

ENTITIES AND DESCRIBE HOW MONEY RECEIVED THROUGH A GRANT
AWARDED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25 WILL BE ALLOCATED.
(c) A COMPREHENSIVE PROPOSAL:
(I) TO DEVELOP OR EXPAND COORDINATED COMMUNITY-BASED
SUPPORTS AND SERVICES THAT OPEN OPPORTUNITIES FOR ECONOMIC
MOBILITY FROM POVERTY IN THE DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA;
(II) THAT LEVERAGES A PARTNERSHIP PROPOSED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION TO PROVIDE A COORDINATED
CONTINUUM OF SUPPORTS AND SERVICES THAT OPEN OPPORTUNITIES FOR
ECONOMIC MOBILITY FROM POVERTY; AND
(III) THAT PRIORITIZES CONNECTING CHILDREN AND YOUTH WITH
HIGH-QUALITY EDUCATIONAL, EXTRACURRICULAR, OR WORKFORCE
PROGRAMMING OR FAMILIES WITH KEY HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE AREAS OF GREATEST NEED IDENTIFIED IN THE
ECONOMIC MOBILITY NEEDS ASSESSMENT SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) TWO OR MORE ELIGIBLE ENTITIES MAY JOINTLY APPLY FOR A
GRANT AWARD TO DELIVER SERVICES ON A REGIONAL BASIS AND MAY
RECEIVE A JOINT GRANT AWARD THAT IS THE AGGREGATE OF THE AMOUNTS
EACH INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE ENTITY WOULD HAVE RECEIVED HAD EACH
ELIGIBLE ENTITY APPLIED INDEPENDENTLY.
(3) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW ALL APPLICATIONS
RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND SELECT THE GRANT RECIPIENTS
AND THE AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT. THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT
AWARD A GRANT WITHOUT THE PRIOR APPROVAL OF THE COUNCIL, AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) THE STATE DEPARTMENT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TIMELINES
ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-25-103 (5)(c), SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COUNCIL A LIST OF THE APPLICANTS CHOSEN TO RECEIVE GRANTS. THE
COUNCIL SHALL EITHER APPROVE OR DISAPPROVE THE ENTIRE LIST OF
ENTITIES BY RESPONDING TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT WITHIN TWENTY DAYS
AFTER SUBMISSION. IF THE COUNCIL DOES NOT RESPOND TO THE STATE
DEPARTMENT WITHIN TWENTY DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE LIST, THE LIST
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-080

IS APPROVED. IF THE COUNCIL DISAPPROVES THE LIST, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT MAY SUBMIT A REPLACEMENT LIST WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER
THE DISAPPROVAL.
(5) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD EACH GRANT APPROVED
BY THE COUNCIL. EACH GRANT IS FOR A PERIOD OF FOUR YEARS. AN
ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT RECEIVES A GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25
MAY APPLY FOR A ONE- OR TWO-YEAR EXTENSION OF THE GRANT PERIOD.
(6) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL BEGIN AWARDING GRANTS
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25 ONLY AFTER THE BALANCE OF THE FUND
REACHES OR EXCEEDS NINE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS. SUBJECT TO
AVAILABLE APPROPRIATIONS, ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD AT LEAST THREE GRANTS AS PROVIDED IN THIS
ARTICLE 25. THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT AWARD MORE THAN
FORTY-NINE PERCENT OF AVAILABLE GRANT PROGRAM MONEY PURSUANT TO
A SINGLE APPLICATION, WHETHER COMPLETED JOINTLY, COLLABORATIVELY,
OR BY A SINGLE ELIGIBLE ENTITY. SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE APPROPRIATIONS,
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 IN EACH SUBSEQUENT YEAR OF THE GRANT PROGRAM,
THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD ADDITIONAL GRANTS AS PROVIDED
IN THIS ARTICLE 25.
(7) WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT'S APPROVAL, AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY
MAY ENTER A FORMAL PARTNERSHIP, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION, AND SUBCONTRACT WITH AND PAY MONEY RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25 TO SUBCONTRACTED ENTITIES TO PROVIDE A
COORDINATED CONTINUUM OF SERVICES, SUPPORTS, AND OPPORTUNITIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE FORMAL PARTNERSHIP. A FORMAL
PARTNERSHIP MUST INCLUDE A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER, AND A NONPROFIT OR NOT-FOR-PROFIT COMMUNITY-BASED
ORGANIZATION.
(8) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 25
TO THE CONTRARY, THE STATE DEPARTMENT IS NOT REQUIRED TO
IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 25 UNTIL THE BALANCE OF THE
FUND REACHES OR EXCEEDS NINE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS.
26-25-106. Reporting requirements - performance indicators.
(1) (a) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A SET OF
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-080

PERFORMANCE INDICATORS TO ASSESS THE ECONOMIC MOBILITY OUTCOMES
AND IMPACTS OF GRANTS AWARDED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25.
INDICATORS MAY INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO:
(I) INCREASED FAMILY ECONOMIC SECURITY;
(II) INCREASED HOUSING SECURITY;
(III) PROGRESS TOWARD EARLY CHILDHOOD DEVELOPMENTAL
MILESTONES, INCLUDING SCHOOL READINESS;
(IV) LOWER RATES OF JUVENILE DELINQUENCY, ADJUDICATION, OR
DETENTION;
(V) LOWER RATES OF FAMILY INVOLVEMENT WITH THE CHILD
WELFARE SYSTEM;
(VI) IMPROVED K-12 ACADEMIC PERFORMANCE;
(VII) HIGHER RATES OF HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION;
(VIII) IMPROVEMENTS IN THE RATES OF COLLEGE READINESS,
MATRICULATION, AND RETENTION AT INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(IX) ENROLLMENT IN WORKFORCE READINESS PROGRAMS;
(X) POSTSECONDARY CREDENTIAL ATTAINMENT; AND
(XI) INCREASED NET WORTH AND DECREASED WEALTH DISPARITY.
(b) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, EACH ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT RECEIVES A GRANT THROUGH THE
GRANT PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT A REPORT THAT
ADDRESSES ITS PROGRESS ON THE APPLICABLE PERFORMANCE INDICATORS
DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION. AT A
MINIMUM, THE REPORT MUST ALSO INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS SERVED;
(II) THE DEMOGRAPHIC INFORMATION OF EACH INDIVIDUAL SERVED;
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-080

AND
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF THE SERVICES PROVIDED THROUGH THE
GRANT PROGRAM AND HOW THE SERVICES MEET ONE OR MORE OF THE
FOLLOWING ECONOMIC MOBILITY PRIORITIES:
(A) PROMOTING FAMILY STABILITY AND WELL-BEING THROUGH
ACCESS TO SAFE, AFFORDABLE, AND STABLE HOUSING; HIGH-QUALITY CHILD
CARE AND EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAMS; ADEQUATE NUTRITION AND
HEALTH CARE; AND SUPPORTS AND SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH
WITH DISABILITIES;
(B) IMPLEMENTING PUBLIC SAFETY PROTECTIONS, COMMUNITY
ENGAGEMENT STRATEGIES, AND INTERVENTIONS TO STRENGTHEN FAMILIES;
(C) PROVIDING HIGH-QUALITY EDUCATIONAL AND ACADEMIC
ENRICHMENT OPPORTUNITIES FOR K-12 STUDENTS THAT SUPPLEMENT BUT
DO NOT SUPPLANT INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, INCLUDING OUT-OF-SCHOOL-TIME
PROGRAMS;
(D) CONNECTING YOUTH TO QUALITY JOBS AND IN-DEMAND
OCCUPATIONS THROUGH POSTSECONDARY AND WORKFORCE READINESS
PROGRAMS;
(E) INCREASING ACCESS TO WEALTH-BUILDING OPPORTUNITIES
THROUGH ASSET-BUILDING STRATEGIES.
(F) COORDINATING AND ALIGNING PROGRAMS AND STRATEGIES
WITHIN A DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA, INCLUDING THE DEVELOPMENT OF
SHARED DATA SYSTEMS; AND
(G) SUCCESS IN MATCHING ADDITIONAL FEDERAL, LOCAL, AND
PRIVATE FUNDING FOR ECONOMIC MOBILITY INITIATIVES IN THE ELIGIBLE
ENTITY'S DESIGNATED SERVICE AREA.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER FOR THE DURATION OF THE GRANT PROGRAM, THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A SUMMARIZED REPORT ON THE GRANT
PROGRAM TO THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEES OF THE
SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, OR ANY SUCCESSOR
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-080

COMMITTEES, AND TO THE GOVERNOR. AT A MINIMUM, THE REPORT MUST
INCLUDE THE NUMBER AND AMOUNT OF GRANTS AWARDED SINCE THE LAST
REPORT, THE AMOUNT OF GRANT MONEY AWARDED TO NON-PUBLIC ENTITIES
THROUGH THE GRANT PROGRAM, INFORMATION ABOUT RELEVANT STAFF
CREDENTIALS AND CERTIFICATIONS FOR EACH ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT
RECEIVES A GRANT THROUGH THE GRANT PROGRAM, AND A SUMMARY OF
INFORMATION CONCERNING THE PERFORMANCE INDICATORS USED TO ASSESS
THE POVERTY-REDUCTION OUTCOMES AND IMPACTS OF GRANTS AWARDED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 25.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), THE REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION CONTINUE INDEFINITELY.
26-25-107. Cradle to career grant program cash fund - grant
program funding.
(1) THE CRADLE TO CAREER GRANT PROGRAM CASH FUND IS
CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF GIFTS, GRANTS,
AND DONATIONS CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
(2) THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 25. THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT
ALL MONEY RECEIVED THROUGH GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS TO THE
STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE FUND.
(3) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME
DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND TO
THE FUND.
(4) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY EXPEND ANY STATE MONEY FROM
THE FUND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS ARTICLE 25.
(5) (a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL ANNUALLY APPROPRIATE
MONEY FROM THE FUND TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT TO IMPLEMENT THE
GRANT PROGRAM.
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-080

(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL NOT APPROPRIATE GENERAL
FUND MONEY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 25.
(6) (a) IF, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2028, THE MONEY IN THE
FUND HAS NEVER REACHED OR EXCEEDED NINE HUNDRED THOUSAND
DOLLARS, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL RETURN FROM THE FUND TO THE
GRANTOR OR DONOR THE AMOUNT OF THE GRANTOR'S OR DONOR'S GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS AND, NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ACCEPT ADDITIONAL GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 25.
(b) IF ANY MONEY REMAINS IN THE FUND AFTER THE STATE
TREASURER RETURNS MONEY TO DONORS OR GRANTORS PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AS APPLICABLE, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL, PRIOR TO THE REPEAL OF THE FUND, TRANSFER ALL UNEXPENDED
AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
26-25-108. Effective date - repeal of article - review of functions.
(1) SECTIONS 26-25-103 (3), 26-25-103 (4), 26-25-103 (5),
26-25-104, 26-25-105, AND 26-25-106 TAKE EFFECT IF THE DEPARTMENT
RECEIVES, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2028, AT LEAST NINE HUNDRED
THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 25. THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING
OF THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)
HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. SECTIONS 26-25-103 (3), 26-25-103
(4), 26-25-103 (5), 26-25-104, 26-25-105, AND 26-25-106 TAKE EFFECT
UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE THAT THE DEPARTMENT HAS
RECEIVED AT LEAST NINE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR THE PURPOSES
OF THIS ARTICLE 25 OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON
THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(2) THIS ARTICLE 25 AND SECTION 24-34-104 (34)(a)(XIV) ARE
REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 31, 2029; EXCEPT THAT, IF THE CONDITION
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION OCCURS:
(a) SECTION 24-34-104 (34)(a)(XIV) IS NOT REPEALED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2);
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-080

(b) THIS ARTICLE 25 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2033;
AND
(c) BEFORE THE REPEAL OCCURS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)
OF THIS SECTION, THIS ARTICLE 25 IS SCHEDULED FOR REVIEW IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-34-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, add
(34)(a)(XVI) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(34) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2033:
(XVI) THE CRADLE TO CAREER GRANT PROGRAM AND THE CRADLE
TO CAREER ADVISORY COUNCIL CREATED IN ARTICLE 25 OF TITLE 26.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-080

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-080